Vermont, session 2025-2026, H64.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 12 V.S.A. § 5136(b) is amended to read:
(b)(1) The Court Administrator is authorized to contract with public or
private agencies to assist plaintiffs to seek relief and to gain access to Superior
Court. Law enforcement agencies shall assist in carrying out the intent of this
section.
(2) The Court Administrator shall establish procedures to ensure access
to orders against sexual assault after regular court hours or on weekends and
holidays in accordance with subdivisions (A)–(D) of this subdivision.
(A) The court shall designate an authorized person to receive requests
for ex parte emergency relief orders submitted after regular court hours
pursuant to section 5134 of this title, including requests made by reliable
electronic means according to the procedures in this subdivision (2).
(B) If a secure setting is not available for processing an ex parte
emergency relief order submitted after regular court hours, or if the authorized
person determines that electronic submission is appropriate under the
circumstances, the authorized person shall inform the applicant that a
complaint and affidavit may be submitted electronically.
(C) The affidavit shall be sworn to or affirmed by administration of
the oath over the telephone to the applicant by the authorized person and shall
conclude with the following statement: “I declare under the penalty of perjury
VT LEG #379791 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.64
2025 Page 3 of 3
pursuant to the laws of the State of Vermont that the foregoing is true and
accurate. I understand that making false statements is a crime subject to a term
of imprisonment or a fine, or both, as provided by 13 V.S.A. § 2904.” The
authorized person shall note on the affidavit the date and time that the oath was
administered.
(D) The authorized person shall communicate the contents of the
complaint and affidavit to a judicial officer telephonically or by reliable
electronic means. The judicial officer shall decide whether to grant or deny the
complaint and issue the order solely on the basis of the contents of the affidavit
or affidavits provided. The judicial officer shall communicate the decision to
the authorized person, who shall communicate it to the applicant. If the order
is issued, it shall be delivered to the appropriate law enforcement agency for
service and to the holding station.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on September 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379791 v.1